Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2028YH (1) 91 lh/ko H.F. 426 Section 1. MEDICAID ââ RECIPIENT WITH PERMANENT DISABILITY 1 ââ DURABLE MEDICAL EQUIPMENT. The department of health and 2 human services shall contractually require that when a Medicaid 3 recipient has a qualifying disability as determined by the 4 federal social security administration, or is determined by 5 the department of health and human services to have a physical 6 or mental impairment or combination of impairments that have 7 lasted or are expected to last for at least twelve months or 8 result in death, a Medicaid managed care organization shall 9 continue to approve coverage for durable medical equipment for 10 which the Medicaid recipient has previously been approved, 11 if there has been no significant change in the Medicaid 12 recipientâs condition. 13